District of Columbia statutes.
29-803.03

Statement of denial.

A person named in a filed statement of authority granting that person authority may deliver to the Mayor for filing a statement of denial that:

(1)

Provides the name of the limited liability company and the caption of the statement of authority to which the statement of denial pertains; and

(2)

Denies the grant of authority.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-802.03.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 303 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).